Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 14.2 Permanent Joint Committee on State Lottery

22-14.2-1.
Permanent joint committee on state lottery — Composition.

There is hereby created a permanent joint committee on state lottery. The permanent joint committee on state lottery shall consist of eight (8) members; four (4) of whom shall be members of the senate, not more than three (3) from the same political party to be appointed by the senate president; and four (4) of whom shall be members of the house of representatives, not more than three (3) from the same political party to be appointed by the speaker of the house.

The senate president and the speaker of the house shall consult with the house and senate minority leaders on the appointment of the minority members.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 234, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 236, § 4.

22-14.2-2.
Powers and duties of permanent joint committee on state lottery.

The permanent joint committee on state lottery shall have the authority to:

Provide oversight to the state lottery and the division of state lottery;

Confer as the committee deems desirable with the director of lotteries;

Recommend the type of lotteries to be conducted;

Issue subpoenas, subpoenas duces tecum and orders for the production of books, accounts, papers, records and documents, and;

Make recommendations to the general assembly and propose legislation regarding the operation of the state lottery.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 234, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 236, § 4.